Indiana, session 2026, SB219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 23-0.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 0.7. UNIFORM ANTITRUST PRE-MERGER
NOTIFICATION ACT
Chapter 1. General Provisions
Sec. 1. This article may be cited as the Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act.
Sec. 2. This article applies to a pre-merger notification filed
after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 3. For purposes of applying and construing this article,
consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law among jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act.
Sec. 4. Nothing in this article may be construed to limit or
replace a requirement imposed under IC 25-1-8.5 (reporting of
health care entity mergers and acquisitions).
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 0.5. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 1. "Additional documentary material" means the additional
documentary material filed with a Hart-Scott-Rodino form.
Sec. 2. "Electronic" means relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or
similar capabilities.
Sec. 3. "Filing threshold" means the minimum size of a
transaction that requires the transaction to be reported under the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, as in effect at the time a person files a
pre-merger notification.
Sec. 4. "Hart-Scott-Rodino Act" refers to Section 201 of the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 (15 U.S.C.
18a), as amended.
Sec. 5. "Hart-Scott-Rodino form" means the form filed with a
pre-merger notification. The term does not include additional
documentary material.
Sec. 6. "Person" means an individual, estate, business or
not-for-profit entity, government or governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.
Sec. 7. "Pre-merger notification" means a notification filed
under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act with:
(1) the Federal Trade Commission; or
(2) the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of
Justice;
or a successor of either agency.
Sec. 8. "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
other territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
Sec. 9. "Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act" means
the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act drafted by the
National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.
Chapter 3. Filing Requirement
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e), not later than
one (1) business day after filing a pre-merger notification under the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, a person shall file a completed electronic
copy of the Hart-Scott Rodino form with the attorney general if:
(1) the person's principal place of business is in Indiana; or
(2) either:
(A) the person; or
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


(B) a person controlled directly or indirectly by the person;
has annual net sales in Indiana, with respect to the goods or
services involved in the proposed merger transaction, in an
amount equal to at least twenty percent (20%) of the filing
threshold.
(b) A person that files a Hart-Scott-Rodino form with the
attorney general under subsection (a)(1) shall include with the
filing a complete electronic copy of the additional documentary
material.
(c) A person that files a Hart-Scott-Rodino form with the
attorney general under subsection (a)(2) shall, upon request of the
attorney general, provide a complete electronic copy of the
additional documentary material to the attorney general not later
than seven (7) days after the date of receipt of the attorney
general's request.
(d) The attorney general may not charge a person a fee in
connection with:
(1) filing a Hart-Scott-Rodino form; or
(2) filing or providing the additional documentary material;
under this section.
(e) An Indiana health care entity that has filed a written notice
of a merger or acquisition with the office of the attorney general
under IC 25-1-8.5-4 is not required to file an electronic copy of the
Hart-Scott-Rodino form under subsection (a). The Indiana health
care entity is required to comply with all other requirements of this
section.
(f) The attorney general shall provide a secure means to receive
and store materials submitted to the attorney general under this
section.
Chapter 4. Confidentiality
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) or IC 23-0.7-5-1,
the following are confidential for purposes of IC 5-14-3 and may
not be disclosed or made public by the attorney general:
(1) A Hart-Scott-Rodino form filed under IC 23-0.7-3-1.
(2) Additional documentary material filed or provided under
IC 23-0.7-3-1.
(3) A Hart-Scott-Rodino form or additional documentary
material provided to the attorney general by the attorney
general of another state.
(4) The fact that a Hart-Scott-Rodino form or additional
documentary material has been:
(A) filed or provided under IC 23-0.7-3-1; or
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


(B) provided by the attorney general of another state.
(5) The fact that the merger transaction that is the subject of
a Hart-Scott-Rodino form has been proposed or any
information related to the proposed merger transaction.
(b) The attorney general may disclose:
(1) a Hart-Scott-Rodino form;
(2) additional documentary material; or
(3) other information described in subsection (a);
pursuant to a protective order issued by an agency, court, or
judicial officer in an administrative proceeding or judicial action
if the proposed merger transaction is relevant to the proceeding or
action.
(c) This section does not:
(1) limit or annul any other:
(A) confidentiality; or
(B) information security;
obligation of the attorney general;
(2) preclude the attorney general from sharing information
with:
(A) the Federal Trade Commission; or
(B) the Antitrust Division of the United States Department
of Justice;
or a successor of either agency; or
(3) subject to subsection (d), preclude the attorney general
from sharing information with the attorney general of
another state that has enacted:
(A) the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act; or
(B) a substantively equivalent act that includes
confidentiality provisions that are at least as protective as
the confidentiality provisions of the Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act.
(d) Before sharing information with the attorney general of
another state under subsection (c)(3), the attorney general must
first receive assurance from the attorney general of the other state
that the information being shared will remain confidential.
(e) Except as otherwise provided by court order or law, not later
than one hundred twenty (120) days after the later of:
(1) the close of the transaction subject to disclosure under
IC 23-0.7-3; or
(2) the final conclusion of any legal proceeding directly
related to the transaction subject to disclosure under
IC 23-0.7-3;
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


the attorney general shall destroy or return all documents
submitted to the attorney general under IC 23-0.7-3.
Chapter 5. Reciprocity
Sec. 1. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the attorney general may
disclose a Hart-Scott-Rodino form and additional documentary
material filed with or provided to the attorney general under
IC 23-0.7-3-1 to the attorney general of another state that has
enacted:
(1) the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act; or
(2) a substantively equivalent act that includes confidentiality
provisions that are at least as protective as the confidentiality
provisions of the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification
Act.
(b) At least five (5) business days before making a disclosure
under subsection (a), the attorney general shall give notice to the
person that filed or provided the Hart-Scott-Rodino form or
additional documentary material under IC 23-0.7-3-1.
(c) Before sharing information with the attorney general of
another state under subsection (a), the attorney general must first
receive assurance from the attorney general of the other state that
the information being shared by the attorney general will remain
confidential.
Chapter 6. Enforcement
Sec. 1. (a) The attorney general shall send a written notice to a
person that is in violation of IC 23-0.7-3-1.
(b) If after three (3) days the person has not cured the violation
described in the notice sent under subsection (a), the attorney
general may impose on the person a civil penalty of not more than
ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day that the
violation remains unremedied.
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Judiciary, to which was
referred Senate Bill No. 219, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, between lines 14 and 15, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 4. Nothing in this article may be construed to limit or
replace a requirement imposed under IC 25-1-8.5 (reporting of
health care entity mergers and acquisitions).".
Page 2, line 8, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 2, line 10, delete ""Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
""Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 2, line 11, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 2, line 13, delete ""Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
""Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 2, line 20, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 2, line 21, delete "and" and insert "or".
Page 2, delete lines 30 through 33, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e), not later than
one (1) business day after filing a pre-merger notification under the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, a person shall file a completed electronic
copy of the Hart-Scott Rodino form with the attorney general if:".
Page 2, line 42, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 3, line 4, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 3, line 12, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 3, between lines 14 and 15, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(e) An Indiana health care entity that has filed a written notice
of a merger or acquisition with the office of the attorney general
under IC 25-1-8.5-4 is not required to file an electronic copy of the
Hart-Scott-Rodino form under subsection (a). The Indiana health
care entity is required to comply with all other requirements of this
section.".
Page 3, line 19, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


Page 3, line 22, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 3, line 25, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 3, line 30, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 3, line 33, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 4, line 5, delete "and" and insert "or".
Page 4, line 18, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
Page 4, line 28, delete "Hart-Scott-Rondino" and insert
"Hart-Scott-Rodino".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 219 as introduced.)
CARRASCO, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 219 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, between lines 31 and 32, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 9. "Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act"
means the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act drafted
by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State
Laws.".
Page 3, between lines 23 and 24, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(f) The attorney general shall provide a secure means to receive
and store materials submitted to the attorney general under this
section.".
Page 4, line 18, after "(3)" insert "subject to subsection (d),".
Page 4, between lines 24 and 25, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(d) Before sharing information with the attorney general of
another state under subsection (c)(3), the attorney general must
first receive assurance from the attorney general of the other state
that the information being shared will remain confidential.
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101


(e) Except as otherwise provided by court order or law, not later
than one hundred twenty (120) days after the later of:
(1) the close of the transaction subject to disclosure under
IC 23-0.7-3; or
(2) the final conclusion of any legal proceeding directly
related to the transaction subject to disclosure under
IC 23-0.7-3;
the attorney general shall destroy or return all documents
submitted to the attorney general under IC 23-0.7-3.".
Page 4, line 26, delete "The" and insert "Subject to subsection (c),
the".
Page 4, line 35, delete "two (2)" and insert "five (5)".
Page 4, between lines 38 and 39, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) Before sharing information with the attorney general of
another state under subsection (a), the attorney general must first
receive assurance from the attorney general of the other state that
the information being shared by the attorney general will remain
confidential.".
Page 4, delete lines 40 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 1. (a) The attorney general shall send a written notice to a
person that is in violation of IC 23-0.7-3-1.
(b) If after three (3) days the person has not cured the violation
described in the notice sent under subsection (a), the attorney
general may impose on the person a civil penalty of not more than
ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day that the
violation remains unremedied.".
Delete page 5.
(Reference is to SB 219 as printed January 23, 2026.)
CHARBONNEAU
SB 219—LS 6798/DI 101